New York, session 2025-2026, A11587.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 602 of the financial services law, as amended by 2 section 1 of part BB of chapter 57 of the laws of 2026, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 § 602. Applicability. This article shall not apply to health care 5 services, including emergency services, where physician fees are subject 6 to schedules or other monetary limitations under any other law, includ- 7 ing the workers' compensation law and article fifty-one of the insurance 8 law, and shall not preempt any such law. [This article also shall not 9 apply to health care services, including emergency services, subject to 10 medical assistance program coverage provided pursuant to section three 11 hundred sixty-four-j of the social services law.] 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to 13 disputes submitted on or after such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16033-01-6